Utah statutes.
59-12-1306.   Purchaser relief from liability.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a purchaser is relieved from a penalty under Section 59-1-401 for failure to pay a tax due under this part or an underpayment if:

(i)  the purchaser's seller or certified service provider relies on incorrect data provided by the commission:

(A)  on a tax rate;

(B)  on a boundary;

(C)  on a taxing jurisdiction; or

(D)  in the taxability matrix the commission provides in accordance with the agreement; or

(ii)  the purchaser, regardless of whether the purchaser holds a direct payment permit in accordance with Section 59-12-107.1, relies on incorrect data provided by the commission:

(A)  on a tax rate;

(B)  on a boundary;

(C)  on a taxing jurisdiction; or

(D)  in the taxability matrix the commission provides in accordance with the agreement.

(b)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(a), a purchaser is not relieved from a penalty under Section 59-1-401 for failure to pay a tax due under this part or an underpayment if the purchaser's, the purchaser's seller's, or the purchaser's certified service provider's reliance on incorrect data provided by the commission is as a result of conduct that is:

(i)  fraudulent;

(ii)  intentional; or

(iii)  willful.

(2)  In addition to the relief from a penalty described in Subsection (1), a purchaser is not liable for a tax or interest under Section 59-1-402 for failure to pay a tax due under this part or an underpayment if:

(a)  the purchaser's seller or certified service provider relies on:

(i)  incorrect data provided by the commission:

(A)  on a tax rate;

(B)  on a boundary; or

(C)  on a taxing jurisdiction; or

(ii)  an erroneous classification by the commission:

(A)  in the taxability matrix the commission provides in accordance with the agreement; and

(B)  with respect to a term:

(I)  in the library of definitions; and

(II)  that is:

(Aa)  listed as taxable or exempt;

(Bb)  included in or excluded from "sales price"; or

(Cc)  included in or excluded from a definition; or

(b)  the purchaser, regardless of whether the purchaser holds a direct payment permit in accordance with Section 59-12-107.1, relies on:

(i)  incorrect data provided by the commission:

(A)  on a tax rate;

(B)  on a boundary; or

(C)  on a taxing jurisdiction; or

(ii)  an erroneous classification by the commission:

(A)  in the taxability matrix the commission provides in accordance with the agreement; and

(B)  with respect to a term:

(I)  in the library of definitions; and

(II)  that is:

(Aa)  listed as taxable or exempt;

(Bb)  included in or excluded from "sales price"; or

(Cc)  included in or excluded from a definition.



Enacted by Chapter 384, 2008 General Session

